Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.450

Pain management rules—Repeal—Adoption of new rules.

(1) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall repeal its rules on pain management, WAC 246-919-800 through 246-919-830.

(2) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall adopt new rules on chronic, noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:

(a)(i) Dosing criteria, including:

(A) A dosage amount that must not be exceeded unless a physician first consults with a practitioner specializing in pain management; and

(B) Exigent or special circumstances under which the dosage amount may be exceeded without consultation with a practitioner specializing in pain management.

(ii) The rules regarding consultation with a practitioner specializing in pain management must, to the extent practicable, take into account:

(A) Circumstances under which repeated consultations would not be necessary or appropriate for a patient undergoing a stable, ongoing course of treatment for pain management;

(B) Minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt a physician from the specialty consultation requirement;

(C) Methods for enhancing the availability of consultations;

(D) Allowing the efficient use of resources; and

(E) Minimizing the burden on practitioners and patients;

(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;

(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall risk for poor outcome; and

(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the emergency department.

(3) The commission shall consult with the agency medical directors' group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the largest professional association of physicians in the state.

(4) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:

(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life care; or

(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a surgical procedure.

[ 2010 c 209 s 5.]